Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB800.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2302(a.1) and (d) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 2302. Interference with lawful taking of wildlife or other activities permitted by this title prohibited.* * *(a.1) Activities which violate section.--A person violates this section when he intentionally or knowingly:(1) drives or disturbs wildlife for the purpose of disrupting the lawful taking of wildlife where another person is engaged in the process of lawfully taking wildlife or other permitted activities;(2) blocks, impedes or otherwise harasses another person who is engaged in the process of lawfully taking wildlife or 12345678910111213141516171819 other permitted activities;(3) uses natural or artificial visual, aural, olfactory or physical stimuli to affect wildlife behavior in order to hinder or prevent the lawful taking of wildlife or other permitted activities;(4) creates or erects barriers with the intent to deny ingress or egress to areas where the lawful taking of wildlife or other permitted activities may occur;(5) interjects himself into the line of fire;(6) affects the condition or placement of personal or public property intended for use in the lawful taking, viewing, photographing or video recording of wildlife or other permitted activities in order to impair its usefulness or prevent its use;(7) enters or remains upon public lands or upon private lands without permission of the owner or their agent, with intent to violate this section; or(8) fails to obey the order of any officer whose duty it is to enforce any of the laws of this Commonwealth where such officer observes any conduct which violates this section or has reasonable grounds to believe that any person intends to engage in such conduct.* * *(d) Penalties.--[A](1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2), a violation of this section is a summary offense of the second degree.(2) A violation of subsection (a)(6) is a summary offense of the first degree. In addition to any penalty, the violator shall be denied the right to hunt or trap in this 20250HB0800PN0810 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth, with or without a license, for a period of one year.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0800PN0810 - 3 - 123